Alabama, session 2026rs, SB220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
67 Section 1. Sections 17-5-14.1 and 17-5-19, Code of
68 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
69 "§17-5-14.1
70 (a) AnyExcept as provided in Section 17-5-14.2, any
71 business or nonprofit corporation, incorporated under the laws
72 of or doing business in this state, or any officer or agent
73 acting on behalf of the corporation may give, pay, expend, or
74 contribute money, services, anything of value for the purposes
75 of establishing, administering, or soliciting voluntary
76 contributions to a separate, segregated fund which can be
77 utilized used for political purposes: (i) to aid or promote
78 the nomination or election of any person, including an
79 incumbent political officeholder or any other person who is or
80 becomes a candidate for political office; or (ii) to aid or
81 promote the interest or success, or defeat of any political
82 party or political proposition. Any separate, segregated fund
83 established hereunder for any of the above enumerated purposes
84 shall be established and administered pursuant to the
Page 3

shall be established and administered pursuant to the
SB220 INTRODUCED
85 following requirements and prohibitions:
86 (1) Any such business or nonprofit corporation, or any
87 officer or agent acting on behalf of such business or
88 nonprofit corporation, may solicit voluntary contributions to
89 the fund only from the corporation's, or its affiliates',
90 stockholders and their families and its employees and their
91 families; or in the case of a nonprofit corporation, its
92 members and their employees. However, the funds may accept
93 voluntary contributions from any individuals.
94 (2) The custodians of any separate, segregated
95 political fund established hereunder pursuant to this section
96 shall file with the Secretary of State such financial
97 disclosure reports or statements now required of a candidate
98 for public office. Filing with the Secretary of State a copy
99 of the information required to be filed with the Federal
100 Election Commission by such separate, segregated fund shall
101 constitute compliance with the reporting provisions of this
102 section.
103 (b) It shall be unlawful:
104 (1) For any separate, segregated political fund
105 established pursuant to this section or for any person acting
106 on behalf of the fund to solicit or secure any money or
107 anything of value by physical force, job discrimination, or
108 financial reprisals, or by threats thereof; by dues, fees, or
109 other moneysmonies required as a condition of employment; or
110 by moneysmonies obtained in any commercial transaction;
111 (2) For any person soliciting contributions to the fund
112 to fail to inform any person being solicited of the political
Page 4

to fail to inform any person being solicited of the political
SB220 INTRODUCED
113 purposes of the fund at the time of the solicitation;
114 (3) For any person soliciting for a contribution to the
115 fund to fail to inform the person being solicited, at the time
116 of the solicitation, of his or her right to refuse to
117 contribute without any reprisal; and
118 (4) For any corporation regulated by the Public Service
119 Commission to pass on to its customers any contribution made
120 for the purpose of establishing, administering, or soliciting
121 voluntary contributions to a separate, segregated fund to be
122 utilized for political purposes."
123 "§17-5-19
124 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
125 person who intentionally violates any provision of this
126 chapter shall be guilty, upon conviction, of a Class A
127 misdemeanor.
128 (b) A person who intentionally violates any reporting
129 requirement of Sections 17-5-4, 17-5-5, or 17-5-8, or
130 17-5-14.2 shall be guilty, upon conviction, of a Class A
131 misdemeanor. A person's failure to promptly file a required
132 report upon discovering or receiving notice from any person
133 that the report has not been filed, or the failure to promptly
134 correct an omission, error, or other discrepancy in a filed
135 report upon discovering or receiving notice of the
136 discrepancy, shall create a rebuttable presumption of intent
137 to violate the applicable reporting requirement.
138 (c) Any person who intentionally violates Section
139 17-5-7 shall be guilty, upon conviction, of a Class B felony.
140 (d) The Attorney General or district attorney for the
Page 5

(d) The Attorney General or district attorney for the
SB220 INTRODUCED
141 appropriate jurisdiction may prosecute violations of this
142 chapter. Venue for cases involving violations of this chapter
143 shall be in the county in which the violation occurred or the
144 county in which the alleged violator resides or is
145 incorporated. If the alleged violator resides or is
146 incorporated outside of the State of Alabama or if the
147 violation or violations occurred outside the State of Alabama,
148 venue shall be in Montgomery County.
149 (e) No prosecution for violation of this chapter shall
150 be commenced later than two years after the date of violation.
151 Notwithstanding the foregoing, a prosecution brought pursuant
152 to Section 17-5-7 shall be commenced within four years after
153 the commission of the offense."
154 Section 2. Section 17-5-14.2 is added to the Code of
155 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
156 §17-5-14.2
157 (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms
158 have the following meanings:
159 (1) CONTRIBUTING SOURCE. a. Any person, including any
160 donor or member of a political donor organization, who
161 knowingly and voluntarily does either of the following:
162 1. Contributes to a political spending fund of a
163 political donor organization.
164 2. Expressly permits the use of the person's monies or
165 other financial resources given to the political donor
166 organization to be used for political spending.
167 b. A nonprofit organization may not be a contributing
168 source and may not contribute to the political spending fund
Page 6

source and may not contribute to the political spending fund
SB220 INTRODUCED
169 of a political donor organization.
170 (2) IDENTITY. a. In the case of an individual, the name
171 and mailing address of the individual; and
172 b. In the case of any other person, the name, mailing
173 address, federal tax status, and state of incorporation,
174 registration, or partnership, if any.
175 (3) NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION. Any corporation, union,
176 association, organization, or other entity exempt from federal
177 income taxes under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4).
178 (4) POLITICAL DONOR ACCOUNTING RECORDS. A written
179 record of: (i) the identity of each contributing source who
180 contributed to the political spending fund of a political
181 donor organization; (ii) the date of receipt of each
182 contribution, deposit, or transfer of monies to the political
183 spending fund by a contributing source; (iii) a record of each
184 contributing source's approval for the use of the contributed
185 funds for political spending; and (iv) the date and identity
186 of each contribution made to, or expenditure made on behalf
187 of, a principal campaign committee.
188 (5) POLITICAL DONOR ORGANIZATION. Any nonprofit
189 organization that uses or transfers monies for political
190 spending.
191 (6) POLITICAL SPENDING. Any contribution to, or
192 expenditure on behalf of, a principal campaign committee.
193 (7) POLITICAL SPENDING FUND. A separate, segregated
194 fund held by a political donor organization solely used for
195 political spending. A political spending fund shall only
196 include financial contributions from a contributing source
Page 7

include financial contributions from a contributing source
SB220 INTRODUCED
197 that has approved in writing the use of the contributed funds
198 for political spending.
199 (b)(1) It shall be unlawful for any nonprofit
200 organization to make a contribution to, or an expenditure on
201 behalf of, a political action committee or a principal
202 campaign committee.
203 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), a nonprofit
204 organization may make a contribution to, or an expenditure on
205 behalf of, a principal campaign committee under the following
206 conditions:
207 a. The nonprofit organization has registered with the
208 Secretary of State as a political donor organization.
209 b. The contribution or expenditure is made entirely
210 from the political donor organization's political spending
211 fund.
212 (c) It shall be unlawful for a political action
213 committee or a principal campaign committee to accept or
214 receive a contribution from a person if the political action
215 committee or principal campaign committee knew or reasonably
216 should have known that the person:
217 (1) Is a nonprofit organization; and
218 (2) Is not registered with the Secretary of State as a
219 political donor organization.
220 (d) Prior to engaging in any political spending, a
221 nonprofit organization must first register with the Secretary
222 of State as a political donor organization in the manner
223 prescribed by the Secretary of State through administrative
224 rule.
Page 8

rule.
SB220 INTRODUCED
225 (e)(1) Each registered political donor organization
226 shall file periodic disclosure reports with the Secretary of
227 State on a schedule prescribed by the Secretary of State, by
228 rule.
229 (2) Each disclosure report shall include the identity
230 of every contributing source that aggregately contributed or
231 donated more than one hundred dollars ($100) to the political
232 spending fund of the political donor organization within the
233 previous 12 months.
234 (f)(1) A political donor organization shall maintain
235 political donor accounting records for a period of five years
236 and provide verified copies of the records, upon request, to
237 the Secretary of State or the State Ethics Commission.
238 (2) It shall be unlawful for any political donor
239 organization or any person acting on behalf of the
240 organization to: (i) require contributions or donations,
241 including dues or fees, to a political spending fund as a
242 condition of membership or association with the nonprofit
243 organization; or (ii) solicit, secure, or acquire any money or
244 anything of value for the political spending fund by physical
245 force, job discrimination, financial reprisal, or by monies
246 obtained in any commercial transaction.
247 (3) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly or
248 intentionally use separate entities or third-party proxies to
249 divide a person's contribution or donation to a political
250 spending fund into smaller sums for the purpose of avoiding
251 the reporting requirements of this act or any rule adopted
252 pursuant to this act.
Page 9

pursuant to this act.
SB220 INTRODUCED
253 (g) Prior to the deposit or use of a contribution or
254 donation to a political spending fund, a political donor
255 organization must provide written notice to a contributing
256 source that informs the person that the contribution or
257 donation will be used solely for political spending. The
258 notice under this subsection must do all of the following:
259 (1) Inform contributing sources in writing that their
260 monies or contributions will be used solely for political
261 spending and that the identity of a contributing source that
262 contributes more than one hundred dollars ($100) within a
263 12-month period will be reported to the Secretary of State for
264 disclosure to the public in accordance with the requirements
265 established by the Secretary of State.
266 (2) Inform contributing sources that any donation or
267 contribution to the political spending fund is voluntary and,
268 if applicable, not required for membership or association with
269 the nonprofit organization.
270 (3) Comply with any additional requirements established
271 by the Secretary of State pursuant to this section and through
272 administrative rules to ensure that the notice reasonably
273 informs contributing sources of the political use of the
274 contribution or donation and the potential public disclosure
275 of the person's identity.
276 (h)(1) The Secretary of State shall establish and
277 maintain, by rule, a schedule for the filing, submission, and
278 publishing of periodic disclosure reports for political donor
279 organizations.
280 (2) All disclosure reports submitted to the Secretary
Page 10

(2) All disclosure reports submitted to the Secretary
SB220 INTRODUCED
281 of State pursuant to this section shall be promptly published
282 on its website for public access and viewing.
283 (i) The Secretary of State may adopt additional
284 administrative rules as necessary to administer this section.
285 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
286 1, 2026.
Page 11